tr: Pena tutuş desteği: Kavrama delikleri (perforasyonlu); Pürüzlü kaplama; Çukur başparmak izi; Yok; Kabartma logo; Kauçuk dolgu; Dokulu kavrama pedi; Diğer
hu: Pengető fogást segítő része: Fogást segítő lyukak (perforált); Szemcsés bevonat; Hüvelykujj-bemélyedés; Nincs; Kiemelkedő logó (dombornyomott); Gumi berakás; Texturált fogásjavító; Egyéb
fi: Plektran otetuki: Pitoaukot (rei'itetty); Karkea pinnoite; Syvennys peukalolle; Ei mitään; Kohokuvioitu logo; Kumiupotus; Teksturoitu pitotyyny; Muu
ko: 픽 그립 보조 장치: 그립 구멍(천공); 그릿 코팅; 움푹 패인 지문 자국; 없음; 볼록한 로고(양각); 고무 인레이; 텍스처 그립 패드; 기타
sl-SI: Pripomoček za oprijem trzalice: Luknje za oprijem (perforirano); Hrapav premaz; Vdolbina za palec; Brez; Izbočen logotip (reliefno); Gumijast vstavek; Teksturirana blazinica za oprijem; Drugo
ja: ピックグリップ補助具: グリップホール (穴あき); グリットコーティング; サムプリントくぼみ; なし; 立体ロゴ (エンボス加工); ラバーインレイ; テクスチャーグリップパッド; その他
nb: Forbedret plektergrep: Gripehull (perforert); Ru belegg; Fordypning for tommel; Ingen; Hevet logo (preget); Gummiinnlegg; Teksturert gripepute; Annet
hr-HR: Pomoć pri hvatanju pick-upom: Rupice za držanje (perforirano); Pjeskareni premaz; Udubljenje za palac; Nema; Izdignuti logotip (reljefni); Gumeni umetak; Teksturirana podloga za držanje; Ostalo
zh-CN: 拨片辅助握把: 防滑孔（穿孔）; 砂砾涂层; 拇指凹槽; 无; 凸起 logo（压花）; 橡胶内嵌; 纹理防滑垫; 其他
vi: Dụng cụ hỗ trợ cầm nắm: Lỗ cầm (đục lỗ); Lớp phủ nhám; Vết lõm ngón cái; Không có; Logo in nổi; Đệm cao su; Đệm cầm có vân; Khác
ro-RO: Ajutor pentru prinderea plectrului: Orificii de prindere (perforate); Acoperire aspră; Amprentă indentată; Fără; Siglă în relief (embosată); Inserție de cauciuc; Pernuță de prindere texturată; Altele
zh-TW: 彈片握持輔助: 止滑孔 (穿孔); 砂礫塗層; 拇指凹槽; 無; 凸起標誌 (浮雕); 橡膠鑲嵌; 紋理防滑墊; 其他
bg-BG: Помощен захват за перце: Отвори за захват (перфорирани); Песъчливо покритие; Вдлъбнатина за палеца; Няма; Изпъкнало лого (релефно); Гумена инкрустация; Текстурирана подложка за захват; Друго
pl: Ułatwienie chwytu kostki: Otwory chwytne (perforowane); Szorstka powłoka; Wgłębienie na kciuk; Brak; Wypukłe logo (tłoczone); Gumowa wstawka; Teksturowana podkładka antypoślizgowa; Inny
de: Griffhilfe für Plektren: Grifflöcher (perforiert); Raue Beschichtung; Daumenmulde; Keine; Erhabenes Logo (geprägt); Gummieinlage; Strukturiertes Griffpad; Andere
it: Ausilio per la presa del plettro: Fori di presa (perforati); Rivestimento ruvido; Impronta rientrata; Nessuno; Logo in rilievo (goffrato); Inserto in gomma; Cuscinetto di presa ruvido; Altro
pt-PT: Auxílio para apanhar patas: Orifícios de aderência (perfurados); Revestimento de granulação; Rebaixo para o polegar; Nenhuma; Logótipo em relevo; Revestimento de borracha; Pad de aderência texturizado; Outra
nl: Plectrum grip hulp: Gripgaten (geperforeerd); Grit-coating; Verzonken duimafdruk; Geen; Verhoogd logo (reliëf); Rubberen inlay; Grip-pad met textuur; Overige
es: Ayuda de agarre de la púa: Orificios de agarre (perforados); Revestimiento granulado; Hendidura para el pulgar; Ninguna; Logo en relieve (estampado); Incrustación de goma; Almohadilla de agarre texturizada; Otra
fr: Dispositif de préhension du médiator: Trous d’adhérence (perforés); Revêtement granuleux; Empreinte de pouce creusée; Aucun; Logo en relief (gaufré); Insert en caoutchouc; Surface d’adhérence texturée; Autre
da: Plektergreb: Gribehuller (perforeret); Ru belægning; Indrykket tommelfingeraftryk; Ingen; Hævet logo (præget); Gummiindlæg; Tekstureret gribepude; Andet
sk-SK: Pomôcka na lepšie uchopenie trsátka: Otvory na úchop (perforované); Drsný povrch; Priehlbina na palec; Žiadne; Vystúpené logo (reliéfne); Gumová vložka; Textúrovaná podložka na úchop; Iné
en: Pick grip aid: Grip holes (perforated); Grit coating; Indented thumbprint; None; Raised logo (embossed); Rubber inlay; Textured grip pad; Other
lt-LT: Mediatoriaus sukibimo pagalba: Skylutės suėmimui (perforuota); Smulkiagrūdė danga; Įdubimas nykščiui; Nėra; Iškilus logotipas (reljefinis); Guminis intarpas; Tekstūruota suėmimo pagalvėlė; Kita
sv: Grepphjälpmedel för plektrum: Grepphål (perforerade); Kornig beläggning; Nedsänkt tumgrepp; Ingen; Upphöjd logotyp (präglad); Gummiinlägg; Strukturerad greppyta; Övrigt
el: Βοήθημα λαβής pick: Οπές λαβής (διάτρητο); Τραχιά επίστρωση; Εσοχή αντίχειρα; Κανένα; Ανάγλυφο λογότυπο; Ένθετο καουτσούκ; Επιφάνεια λαβής με υφή; Άλλο
th: อุปกรณ์ช่วยจับยึด: เจาะรูจับ; เคลือบผิวสาก; รอยบุ๋มสำหรับนิ้วโป้ง; ไม่มี; โลโก้นูน; ฝังยาง; แผ่นรองจับแบบมีเท็กซ์เจอร์; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Palheta auxílio de pegada: Furos de aderência (perfurados); Revestimento áspero; Rebaixo para polegar; Nenhum; Logo em relevo; Inserção de borracha; Almofada de aderência texturizada; Outros
ru: Элемент улучшения хвата медиатора: Отверстия для захвата (перфорация); Шероховатое покрытие; Выемка под большой палец; Нет; Выпуклый логотип (тиснение); Резиновая вставка; Текстурированная накладка; Другое
cs: Pomůcka pro uchopení trsátka: Otvory pro úchop (perforované); Drsný povrch; Prolis pro palec; Žádné; Vystouplé logo (reliéfní); Gumová vložka; Texturovaná úchopová plocha; Ostatní